Utah statutes.
78B-5-409.   Conversions of foreign money in a distribution proceeding.
The rate of exchange prevailing at or near the closing of business on the day
the proceeding is initiated shall govern all exchanges of foreign money in a
distribution proceeding.  A foreign-money claimant in a distribution
proceeding must assert its claim in the named foreign money and show the
amount of United States dollars resulting from a conversion as of the date the
proceeding was initiated.
